Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201368-153
Employable recipients; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 68-151 to 68-155:

(1) Community service shall mean labor performed for a governmental
agency, nonprofit corporation, or health care corporation;

(2) Employable recipient shall mean any individual who is eighteen years
of age or older, who is receiving county general assistance pursuant to sections
68-131 to 68-148, who is not engaged in full-time employment or satisfactorily
participating in a county-approved vocational, rehabilitation, job training,
or community service program, and who is not rendered unable to work by illness
or significant and substantial mental or physical incapacitation to the degree
and of the duration that the illness or incapacitation prevents the person
from performing designated vocational, rehabilitation, job training, or community
service activities;

(3) Full-time employment shall mean being employed at least twenty-five
hours per week and receiving wages, tips, and other compensation which meet
the applicable federal minimum wage requirements; and

(4) Job training program shall mean vocational training in technical
job skills and equivalent knowledge.

Laws 1990, LB 422, § 3;

Laws 1991, LB 227, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB156, § 1.
September 6, 2013